Hawaii statutes.
§205A-43 Establishment of shoreline
setbacks and duties and powers of the department. (a) Setbacks along
shorelines are established of not less than twenty feet and not more than forty
feet inland from the shoreline. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91, and shall enforce the shoreline setbacks and rules pertaining
thereto.

(b) The powers and duties of the department
shall include, but not be limited to:

(1) The department shall adopt rules under chapter 91
prescribing procedures for determining the shoreline setback line; and

(2) The department shall review the plans of all
applicants who propose any structure, activity, or facility that would be
prohibited without a variance pursuant to this part. The department may
require that the plans be supplemented by accurately mapped data and
photographs showing natural conditions and topography relating to all existing
and proposed structures and activities. [L 1986, c 258, pt of §1; am L 1989, c
356, §11]

Case Notes

Cited: 132 H. 9, 319 P.3d 1017 (2014).

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next